Utah statutes.
7-7-11.   Meetings of stock association stockholders -- Voting -- Notice.
(1)  An annual meeting of the stockholders of each capital stock association
shall be held at the time and place fixed in the bylaws of the association.
Special meetings may be called as provided in the bylaws.
(2)  The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting of the stockholders
shall be those who are stockholders of record on a date fixed in advance by
the board of directors.  The record date shall be not more than 60 days and
not less than 20 days before the date of the meeting.  If the board of
directors fails to fix the date by the 20th day preceding the meeting, the
record date shall be the 20th day preceding the meeting.  When a determination
of stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting has been made as provided in
this section, the determination shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting.
(3)  In the determination of all questions requiring action by the
stockholders, each stockholder shall be entitled to cast one vote for each
share of voting stock recorded in his name on the books of the association on
the record date fixed as provided in this section. The articles of
incorporation or bylaws of an association may, but need not, provide that at
each election for directors every stockholder entitled to vote at the election
has the right to vote the number of shares owned by him for as many persons as
there are directors to be elected and for whose election he has a right to
vote or to cumulate his votes by giving one candidate as many votes as the
number of the directors to be elected multiplied by the number of his shares
shall equal, or by distributing the votes on the same principle among any
number of candidates.
(4)  At any meeting of the stockholders and members, voting may be in person
or by proxy, but no proxy shall be eligible to be voted at any meeting unless
the proxy shall have been filed with the secretary of the association, for
verification, at least five days before the date of the meeting.  Every proxy
shall be in writing and signed by the stockholder or member or his duly
authorized attorney-in-fact and, when filed with the secretary, shall, if so
specified in the proxy, continue in force from year to year until revoked by a
writing duly delivered to the secretary or until superseded by subsequent
proxies.
(5)  At an annual meeting or at any special meeting of the stockholders, a
majority of the outstanding shares of the association entitled to vote,
represented in person or by proxy, constitutes a quorum.  A majority of all
votes cast at any meeting of stockholders shall determine any question unless
this chapter specifically provides otherwise.
(6)  A capital stock association may by its articles of incorporation or
bylaws grant membership rights to one or more classes of persons who are
either borrowers from or have savings accounts with the association.  Each
such member may, but need not, be given the right to vote as a member and, if
given that right, shall enjoy the same voting rights as a holder of one share
of capital stock.
(7)  No notice of annual meetings of stockholders need be given.  Notice of
each special meeting of stockholders shall state the purposes for which the
meeting is called, the place of meeting, and the time when it shall convene,
and shall be delivered not less than ten nor more than 50 days before the date
of the meeting, either personally or by mail, to each stockholder of record
entitled to vote at such meeting; provided, however, that if all the
stockholders entitled to vote, vote in favor of an action at any meeting of
the stockholders, no notice need be given.  If mailed, notice is considered to
be delivered when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the
stockholder at his address as it appears on the stock transfer books of the
association, with postage on the notice prepaid.
